District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.04

Board of Elections — Qualifications; prohibited activities; compensation; removal; time for filling vacancy.

(a)

When appointing a member of the Board, the Mayor and Council shall consider whether the individual possesses demonstrated integrity, independence, and public credibility and whether the individual has particular knowledge, training, or experience in government ethics or in elections law and procedure. A person shall not be a member of the Board unless he or she:

(1)

Is a duly registered voter;

(2)

Has resided in the District continuously since the beginning of the 3-year period ending on the day he or she is appointed; and

(3)

Holds no other paid office or employment in the District government and no active office, position, or employment in the federal government.

(b)

No person, while a member of the Board, shall:

(1)

Campaign for any other public office;

(2)

Hold any office in any political party or political committee;

(3)

Participate in or contribute to any political campaign of any candidate in any election held under this subchapter;

(3A)

Be an officer or a director of an organization receiving District funds, or an employee of an organization receiving District funds, who has managerial or discretionary responsibilities with respect to those funds;

(4)

Act in his or her capacity as a member, to directly or indirectly attempt to influence any decision of a District government agency, department, or instrumentality relating to any action which is beyond the jurisdiction of the Board; or

(5)

Be convicted of having committed a felony in the District of Columbia; or if the crime is committed elsewhere, conviction of such offense as would be a felony in the District of Columbia.

(c)

Each member of the Board, including the Chairman, shall receive compensation as provided in § 1-611.08(c)(2).

(d)

(1)

The Mayor may remove any member of the Board who engages in any activity prohibited by subsection (a) or (b) of this section, and appoint a new member to serve until the expiration of the term of the member so removed. When the Mayor believes that any member has engaged in any such activity he or she shall notify such member, in writing, of the charge against him or her and that such member has 7 days in which to request a hearing before the Council on such charge. If such member fails to request a hearing within 7 days after receiving such notice then the Mayor may remove such member and appoint a new member.

(2)

The hearing requested by a member may be either open or closed, as requested by such member. In the event such hearing is closed, the vote of the Council as a result of such hearing shall be taken at an open meeting of the Council. The Council shall begin such hearings within 60 calendar days after receiving notice from the Mayor indicating that a member has requested such a hearing. If two-thirds of the Council vote to remove such member then such member shall be removed.

(e)

Any vacancy occurring on the Board shall be filled within 45 days after the occurrence of such vacancy, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 699, ch. 862, § 4
Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 205(i)
Dec. 23, 1971, 85 Stat. 794, Pub. L. 92-220, § 1(26)
Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 471, Pub. L. 93-376, title VII, § 706(b)
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title I, § 102(3), (4), 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 103(a), title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-50, § 2, 24 DCR 4806
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 2, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(v), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(gg), 27 DCR 2632
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 2(n), (q), (s), 29 DCR 458
Feb. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-103, § 2(b), 56 DCR 9169
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(g)(3), 59 DCR 1862
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1133, 59 DCR 8025

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1304.
1973 Ed., § 1-1104.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-103 rewrote subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b)(3A).
D.C. Law 19-124, in the section heading, substituted “Board of Elections” for “Board of Elections and Ethics”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 rewrote (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2(b), 4(a) of Omnibus Election Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-236, November 30, 2009, 56 DCR 9154).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(g)(3) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Editor's Notes

Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 18-103 provided: “(a) Section 2(b)(1) shall not apply to any individual who is a member of the Board of Elections and Ethics on the effective date of this act.”